Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-325
Domestic insurer; dividends; payment; limitation.

No domestic insurer shall declare or pay a dividend from any source other than earned surplus. For purposes of this section, earned surplus means an amount equal to the unassigned funds of an insurer as set forth in the most recent annual statement of the insurer submitted to the Director of Insurance including any surplus arising from unrealized capital gains or revaluation of assets.

Any dividend in excess of the unassigned funds of an insurer, excluding any surplus arising from unrealized capital gains or revaluation of assets, shall be deemed an extraordinary dividend and shall be subject to the requirements of section 44-2134.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 53, p. 420;

R.S.1913, § 3189;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 24, p. 599;

C.S.1922, § 7789;

C.S.1929, § 44-324;

R.S.1943, § 44-325;

Laws 1976, LB 916, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 689, § 1.